Massachusetts, session 194th, S3097.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 303 of the acts of 2018 is hereby amended by striking 
the second sentence and replacing it with the following sentence: 
“A portion of the fees collected for boat storage, a portion of any fees collected pursuant 
to chapter 118 of the acts of 2008, and all waterways user fees, shall be deposited into the fund, 
without further appropriation.' 
SECTION 2. Section 2 of chapter 303 of the acts of 2018 is hereby amended by striking 
the entire section and replacing it with the following: 
“The following revenues from fees in the town of Dennis shall be deposited into the fund, 
without further appropriation: 1) fifty percent of the revenue collected from the boat storage fees; 
2) fifty percent of the revenue from transient boater fees; 3) thirty seven and one-half percent of 
the revenues from fees for daily parking of vehicles and trailers; 4) twenty five percent of the 

of 2 12 revenues from fees from slip holders; 5) one hundred percent of the revenues from fees for boats 
utilizing private docks, as well as fees for dry stored launched boats also known as rack-stored 
boats; and 6) one hundred percent of the revenues from waterways user fees. 
If authorized by by-law, the select board of the town of Dennis may increase or decrease 
the percentages of the above-fees deposited into the fund." 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.